Hawaii statutes.
§431:6-103 Eligible investments; scope.
(a) This article shall apply to domestic insurers only. Insurers shall invest
in or loan their funds on the security of, and shall hold as assets, only
eligible investments as prescribed in this article.

(b) The eligibility of an investment shall be
determined as of the date of its making or acquisition.

(c) Any limitation based upon the amount of
the insurer's assets or surplus shall relate to assets or surplus as shown by
the insurer's annual statement as of December 31 preceding date of investment.
[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2008, c 142, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next